Washington statutes.
RCW 35.49.070

Payment by county.

Upon the confirmation of the assessment roll for a local improvement district or utility local improvement district, the city or town treasurer shall certify and forward to the board of county commissioners a statement of all the lots, tracts, or parcels of land held or owned by the county assessed thereon, separately describing each lot, tract, or parcel, with the amount of the assessment charged against it.

The board of county commissioners shall cause the amount of such local assessments to be paid to the city or town as other claims against the county are paid.

If title to any property thus described was acquired by the county through foreclosure of general tax liens, the county shall:

(1) Pay the assessment from the proceeds of the sale of the property; or

(2) Sell the property subject to the lien of the assessment.

[ 1967 c 52 s 15; 1965 c 7 s 35.49.070. Prior: 1929 c 139 s 1; 1905 c 29 s 3; RRS s 9342.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1967 c 52: See notes following RCW 35.43.042.